Utah statutes.
16-7-2.   Articles of incorporation -- Execution -- Filing.

Any person who is the archbishop, bishop, president, trustee in trust, president of stake, president of congregation, overseer, presiding elder, or clergyman of any church or religious society who has been duly chosen, elected, or appointed in conformity with the constitution, canons, rites, regulations, or discipline of such church or religious society, and in whom is vested the legal title to its property, may make and subscribe articles of incorporation, acknowledge the same before some officer authorized to take acknowledgments, and file the original articles with the Division of Corporations and Commercial Code; he shall retain a copy of these articles in his possession.



Amended by Chapter 178, 1985 General Session

